Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 13 Traffic Control Devices

31-13-1.
State traffic commission — Manual of traffic control devices.

There is established a state traffic commission consisting of the superintendent of state police or his or her designee from within the department of state police, the director of the department of revenue or his or her designee from within the division of motor vehicles, the director of the department of transportation or his or her designee from within the department of transportation, the governor’s representative to the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration or his or her designee, and a member of the public appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate, with respect to which appointment the governor shall solicit and give due consideration to the recommendation of the Rhode Island Police Chief’s Association. The commission shall elect from among the members a chair and such other officers as it deems necessary.

For the purpose of standardization and uniformity, the commission shall adopt and cause to be printed for publication a manual of regulations and specifications establishing a uniform system of traffic control signals, devices, signs, and marking consistent with the provisions of this chapter for use upon the public highways. The commission shall establish the traffic regulations under chapters 12 — 27 of this title. The commission shall meet not less frequently than monthly. The department of transportation shall provide all staff services and quarters required by the commission.

Within ninety (90) days after the end of each fiscal year, the commission shall approve and submit an annual report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the secretary of state, of its activities during that fiscal year. The report shall provide: an operating statement summarizing meetings or hearings held, including meetings minutes, subjects addressed, decisions rendered, applications considered and their disposition, rules or regulations promulgated, studies conducted, policies and plans developed, approved, or modified, and programs administered or initiated; a consolidated financial statement of all funds received and expended including the source of the funds, a listing of any staff supported by these funds, and a summary of any clerical, administrative or technical support received; a summary of performance during the previous fiscal year including accomplishments, shortcomings and remedies; a synopsis of hearings, complaints, suspensions, or other legal matters related to the authority of the counsel; a summary of any training courses held pursuant to the provisions of this chapter; a briefing on anticipated activities in the upcoming fiscal year, and findings and recommendations for improvements. The report shall be posted electronically on the websites of the general assembly and the secretary of state pursuant to the provisions of §

42-20-8.2

. The director of the department of transportation shall be responsible for the enforcement of the provisions of this subsection.

To conduct a training course for newly appointed and qualified members within six (6) months of their qualification or designation. The course shall be developed by the chair of the commission, be approved by the commission, and be conducted by the chair of the commission. The commission may approve the use of any commission and/or staff members and/or individuals to assist with training. The training course shall include instruction in the following areas: the provisions of chapter 46 of title 42, chapter 14 of title 36, and chapter 2 of title 38; and the commission’s rules and regulations. The director of the department of transportation shall, within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this act [June 16, 2006], prepare and disseminate training materials relating to the provisions of chapter 46 of title 42, chapter 14 of title 36, and chapter 2 of title 38.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 22, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-13-1

; P.L. 1968, ch. 113, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 5, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 111, § 4; P.L. 1971, ch. 7, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 259, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 103, § 4; P.L. 2006, ch. 144, § 4; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 13; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 13; P.L. 2011, ch. 46, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 50, § 1.

31-13-2.
Devices on state highways.

The state traffic commission shall place and maintain any traffic control devices, conforming to its manual and specifications, upon any state highways, that it shall deem necessary to indicate and to carry out the provisions of chapters 12 — 27 of this title or to regulate, warn, or guide traffic.

No local authority shall place or maintain any traffic control device upon any highway under the jurisdiction of the state traffic commission except by the latter’s permission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 22, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-13-2

.

31-13-3.
Devices on local highways.

The traffic authority of any city or town may place and maintain traffic control signals, signs, markings, and other safety devices upon the highways under their jurisdiction as they may deem necessary to indicate and carry out the provisions of chapters 12 — 27 of this title, or local traffic ordinances or to regulate, warn or guide traffic, provided the signals, signs, markings, and devices conform to the regulations and specifications established by the state traffic commission in accordance with this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 22, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-13-3

; P.L. 1968, ch. 113, § 2.

31-13-4.
Obedience to devices.

The driver of any vehicle shall obey the instructions of any official traffic control device applicable to him or her placed in accordance with the provisions of chapters 12 — 27 of this title, unless otherwise directed by a traffic or police officer, subject to the exceptions granted the driver of an authorized emergency vehicle in those chapters. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 22, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-13-4

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 108.

31-13-5.
Signs prerequisite to enforcement of provisions.

No provision of chapters 12 — 27 of this title for which signs are required shall be enforced against an alleged violator if, at the time and place of the alleged violation, an official sign is not in proper position and sufficiently legible to be seen by an ordinarily observant person. Whenever a particular section does not state that signs are required, the section shall be effective even though no signs are erected or in place.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 22, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-13-5

.

31-13-6.
Meaning of traffic control signals.

Traffic control signals shall have the following meanings for vehicles and pedestrians:

Steady green signals shall have the following meanings:

Vehicular traffic facing a circular green signal is permitted to proceed straight through or turn right or left or make a U-turn movement, except as such movement is prohibited by lane-use signs, turn prohibition signs, lane markings, separate turn signal, or other traffic control devices.

Vehicular traffic, including vehicles turning right or left or making a U-turn movement, shall yield the right-of-way to:

Pedestrians lawfully within an associated crosswalk; and

Other vehicles lawfully within the intersection.

Vehicular traffic turning left or making a U-turn movement to the left shall yield the right-of-way to other vehicles approaching from the opposite direction so closely as to constitute an immediate hazard during the time when such turning vehicle is moving across or within the intersection.

Pedestrians facing a circular green signal, unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian signal or other traffic control device, are permitted to proceed across the roadway within any marked or unmarked associated crosswalk. The pedestrian shall yield the right-of-way to vehicles lawfully within the intersection or so close as to create an immediate hazard at the time that the green signal is first displayed.

A bicyclist facing a green bicycle signal may proceed straight through or turn right or left unless a sign at that place prohibits either turn. The bicyclist shall yield the right-of-way to other vehicles within the intersection at the time the green bicycle signal is shown.

Vehicular traffic facing a green arrow signal, displayed alone or in combination with another signal, is permitted to cautiously enter the intersection only to make the movement indicated by the arrow, or such other movement as is permitted by other signals displayed at the same time.

Vehicular traffic, including vehicles turning right or left or making a U-turn movement, shall yield the right-of-way to:

Pedestrians lawfully within an associated crosswalk; and

Other vehicles lawfully within the intersection.

Pedestrians facing a green arrow signal, unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian signal or other traffic control device, shall not cross the roadway.

Steady yellow signals shall have the following meanings:

Vehicular traffic facing a steady circular yellow signal is warned that the related green movement is being terminated and that a steady red signal will be displayed immediately thereafter when vehicular traffic shall not enter the intersection. The rules set forth concerning vehicular operation under the movement(s) being terminated shall continue to apply while the steady circular yellow signal indication is displayed.

A bicyclist facing a steady yellow bicycle signal is thereby warned that the related right-of-way is being terminated and that a red bicycle signal will be shown immediately. A bicyclist facing a steady yellow bicycle signal shall stop at a clearly marked stop line, but if none, shall stop before entering the marked crosswalk on the near side of the intersection, or if there is no marked crosswalk, then before entering the intersection. If a bicyclist cannot stop safely, the bicyclist may proceed cautiously through the intersection.

Vehicular traffic facing a steady yellow arrow signal is warned that the related green arrow movement or the related flashing arrow movement is being terminated. The rules set forth concerning vehicular operation under the movement(s) being terminated shall continue to apply while the steady yellow arrow signal is displayed.

Pedestrians facing a steady circular yellow or yellow arrow signal, unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian signal or other traffic control device, shall not start to cross the roadway.

Steady red signals shall have the following meanings:

Vehicular traffic facing a steady circular red signal, unless entering the intersection to make another movement permitted by another signal, shall stop at a clearly marked stop line; but if there is no stop line, traffic shall stop before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection; or if there is no crosswalk, then before entering the intersection; and shall remain stopped until a signal to proceed is displayed, or as provided below:

Except when a traffic control device is in a place prohibiting a turn on red or a steady red arrow signal is displayed, vehicular traffic facing a steady circular red signal is permitted to enter the intersection to turn right. The right to proceed with the turn shall be subject to the rules applicable after making a stop at a stop sign.

Vehicular traffic facing a steady red arrow signal shall not enter the intersection to make the movement indicated by the arrow, unless entering the intersection to make another movement permitted by another signal, and shall stop at a clearly marked stop line; but if there is no stop line, before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection; or if there is no crosswalk, then before entering the intersection; and shall remain stopped until a signal or other traffic control device permitting the movement indicated by the red arrow is displayed.

Pedestrians facing a steady circular red or steady red arrow signal shall not enter the roadway, unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian signal or other traffic control device.

A bicyclist facing a steady red bicycle signal shall stop at a clearly marked stop line, but if none, before entering the marked crosswalk on the near side of the intersection, or if there is no marked crosswalk, then before entering the intersection. The bicyclist shall remain stopped until a green bicycle signal is shown.

Flashing yellow signals shall have the following meanings:

Vehicular traffic on an approach to an intersection facing a flashing circular yellow signal is permitted to cautiously enter the intersection to proceed straight through or turn right or left or make a U-turn except as such movement is prohibited by lane-use signs, turn prohibition signs, lane markings, turn signals, or other traffic control devices.

Such vehicular traffic, including vehicles turning right or left or making a U-turn, shall yield the right-of-way to:

Pedestrians lawfully within an associated crosswalk; and

Other vehicles lawfully within the intersection.

Vehicular traffic turning left or making a U-turn to the left shall yield the right-of-way to other vehicles approaching from the opposite direction so closely as to constitute an immediate hazard during the time when the turning vehicle is moving across or within the intersection.

When a flashing circular yellow signal(s) is displayed as a beacon to supplement another traffic control device, road users are notified that there is a need to pay extra attention to the message contained thereon or that the regulatory or warning requirements of the other traffic control device, which may not be applicable at all times, are currently in force.

Vehicular traffic, on an approach to an intersection facing a flashing yellow arrow signal, displayed alone or in combination with another signal, is permitted to cautiously enter the intersection only to make the movement indicated by such arrow, or other such movement as is permitted by other signal displayed at the same time.

Vehicular traffic, including vehicles turning right or left or making a U-turn, shall yield the right-of-way to:

Pedestrians lawfully within an associated crosswalk; and

Other vehicles lawfully within the intersection.

Vehicular traffic turning left or making a U-turn to the left shall yield the right-of-way to other vehicles approaching from the opposite direction so closely as to constitute an immediate hazard during the time when the turning vehicle is moving across or within the intersection.

Pedestrians facing any flashing yellow signal at an intersection, unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian signal or other traffic control device, are permitted to proceed across the roadway within any marked or unmarked associated crosswalk. Pedestrians shall yield the right-of-way to vehicles lawfully within the intersection at the time that the flashing yellow signal is first displayed.

Flashing red signals shall have the following meanings:

Vehicular traffic, on an approach to an intersection facing a flashing circular red signal shall stop at a clearly marked stop line; but if there is no stop line, before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection; or if there is no crosswalk, at the point nearest the intersecting roadway where the driver has a view of approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway before entering the intersection. The right to proceed shall be subject to the rules applicable after making a stop at a stop sign.

When a flashing circular red signal(s) is displayed as a beacon to supplement another traffic control device, road users are notified that there is a need to pay extra attention to the message contained thereon or that the regulatory requirements of the other traffic control device, which may not be applicable at all times, are currently in force.

Vehicular traffic, on an approach to an intersection, facing a flashing red arrow signal if intending to turn in the direction indicated by the arrow shall stop at a clearly marked stop line; but if there is no stop line, before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection; or if there is no crosswalk, at the point nearest the intersecting roadway where the driver has a view of approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway before entering the intersection. The right to proceed with the turn shall be limited to the direction indicated by the arrow and shall be subject to the rules applicable after making a stop at a stop sign.

Pedestrians facing any flashing red signal at an intersection, unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian control signal or other traffic control device, are permitted to proceed across the roadway within any marked or unmarked associated crosswalk. Pedestrians shall yield the right-of-way to vehicles lawfully within the intersection at the time that the flashing red signal is first displayed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 22, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-13-6

; P.L. 1963, ch. 81, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 25, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 108; P.L. 2004, ch. 449, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 538, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 67, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 193, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 261, § 1.

31-13-7.
Signals at places other than intersections.

In the event an official traffic control signal is erected and maintained at a place other than an intersection, the provisions of §

31-13-6

shall be applicable except as to those provisions which by their nature can have no application. Any stop required shall be made at a sign or marking on the pavement indicating where the stop shall be made, but in the absence of the sign or marking, the stop shall be made at the signal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 22, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-13-7

.

31-13-8.
Pedestrian control signals.

Whenever special pedestrian control signals exhibiting the words “walk” or “wait” or “don’t walk” are in place the signals shall indicate as follows:

Walk. Pedestrians facing the signal may proceed across the roadway in the direction of the signal and shall be given the right-of-way by the drivers of all vehicles.

Wait or don’t walk. No pedestrian shall start to cross the roadway in the direction of the signal, but any pedestrian who has partially completed his or her crossing on the walk signal, shall proceed to a sidewalk or safety island while the “wait” or “don’t walk” signal is showing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 22, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-13-8

.

31-13-9.
Flashing signals.

Whenever an illuminated flashing red or yellow signal is used in a traffic sign or signal it shall require obedience by vehicular traffic as follows:

Flashing red (stop signal). When a red lens is illuminated with rapid intermittent flashes, drivers of vehicles shall stop before entering the nearest crosswalk at an intersection or at a limit line when marked, or, if none, then before entering the intersection, and the right to proceed shall be subject to the rules applicable after making a stop at a stop sign.

Flashing yellow (caution signal). When a yellow lens is illuminated with rapid intermittent flashes, drivers of vehicles may proceed through the intersection or past the signal only with caution.

Flashing green (pedestrian signal). When a green lens is illuminated with rapid intermittent flashes, drivers of vehicles may proceed through the intersection or crosswalk past the signal only with caution.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 22, § 7; P.L. 1952, ch. 2937, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

31-13-9

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 108.

31-13-10.
Unauthorized signs and devices prohibited.

No person shall place, maintain, or display upon or in view of any highway any unauthorized sign, signal, marking, or device which purports to be or is an imitation of or resembles an official traffic control device or railroad sign or signal, or which attempts to direct the movement of traffic, or which hides from view or interferes with the effectiveness of any official traffic control device or any railroad sign or signal, and no person shall place or maintain upon any highway any traffic sign or signal bearing on it any commercial advertising without the consent of the chief of police of the city or town in which the highway is located. This shall not be deemed to prohibit the erection upon private property adjacent to highways of signs giving useful directional information and of a type that cannot be mistaken for official signs.

Every prohibited sign, signal, or marking is declared to be a public nuisance, and the authority having jurisdiction over the highway is empowered to remove it or cause it to be removed without notice.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 22, § 8; P.L. 1953, ch. 3207, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-13-10

.

31-13-10.1.
Traffic control signal preemption devices.

As used in this section, “traffic control signal preemption device” means any device, either mechanical or electrical, that emits a pulse of light or other signal that, when received by a detector attached to a traffic control signal, changes that traffic control signal to a green light or, if the traffic control signal is already green, extends the duration of the green light.

Except as provided in subsection (d), no retailer or manufacturer shall sell or install any traffic control signal preemption device on a motor vehicle, nor may any such device be transported in the passenger compartment of a motor vehicle, nor be operated by the driver or passenger of a motor vehicle.

Any person who shall violate the provisions of subsection (b) of this section shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500), which fine shall be deposited into the state general fund.

Installation of a traffic control signal preemption device is permitted on the following vehicles, and operation of the device is permitted as follows:

Police department vehicles, when responding to a bona fide emergency, when used in combination with red or blue oscillating, rotating, or flashing lights;

Law enforcement vehicles of state or local authorities, when responding to a bona fide emergency, when used in combination with red oscillating, rotating, or flashing lights; and

Vehicles of local fire departments and state or federal firefighting vehicles, when responding to a bona fide emergency, when used in combination with red oscillating, rotating, or flashing lights.

Buses under the operation and/or control of the Rhode Island public transit authority, only when used to prolong a green light signal.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 384, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 450, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 35, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 263, § 1.

31-13-11.
Injury to signs and devices.

No person shall without lawful authority attempt to or in fact alter, deface, injure, knock down, or remove any official traffic control device or any railroad sign or signal or any inscription, shield, or insignia on it or any other part of it. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 22, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

31-13-11

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 108.

31-13-12.
Traffic control near road construction and maintenance operation.

The standards set forth in section VI of the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices for Streets and Highways, prepared by the National Joint Committee on Uniform Traffic Control Devices, pertaining to situations where traffic must be moved through or around road construction and maintenance operations, are incorporated by reference and are to be considered the minimum standards relative to those situations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 21, § 1.

31-13-13.
Hospital sign indicating emergency treatment facility.

The director of transportation is directed to include on all signs indicating a hospital area, directions to a hospital, or the presence of a hospital, and whether the hospital has an emergency treatment facility.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 238, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 13; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 13.

31-13-14.
Time period to complete projects.

All projects approved by the state traffic commission pursuant to this chapter shall be completed before the end of the following construction season with the exception of geometric improvements/roundabouts and new signals.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 450, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 477, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 23.